Tennessee, session 114, HB1283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-2-134(c), is amended by deleting
the language "shall be retained by the county election commission for two (2) years from the
date of the purge" and substituting instead "shall be retained by the county election commission
for three (3) years from the date of the purge".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1283
002918
- 1 -